Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General

§ 37-2-101.
Creation; composition; appointment; compensation; terms and oaths of members; removal; chairman and deputy chairman; vacancies.

There is created a commission separate from the state board of equalization to which it has been joined which is known as the “public service commission of Wyoming”. The commission shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members of the commission shall at any time be members of the same political party. Each member of the commission shall receive an annual salary as provided by law, to be paid in equal monthly installments in the same manner that other state salaries are paid.

Biennially the members shall elect from among their number a chairman and a deputy chairman who shall serve in these offices for a period of two (2) years. The chairman shall receive an additional annual salary as provided by law during his tenure as chairman to be paid in equal monthly installments, in the same manner as other state salaries are paid.

The present elected chairman and two (2) designated members now comprising the public service commission, or their successors, comprise the public service commission for purposes of this section.

Upon the expiration of the term of any member he shall be reappointed or a successor shall be appointed for a term of six (6) years or except in case of a vacancy. Each member shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

In case of a vacancy, it shall be filled by appointment by the governor in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

.

Each member, within thirty (30) days after notice of his appointment and before entering upon the discharge of his duties, shall take, subscribe and file with the secretary of state the oath of office prescribed by the constitution of this state. Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms under this act shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 93, § 1; 1945, ch. 142, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 64-103; Laws 1949, ch. 66, § 1; 1951, ch. 44, § 25; 1953, ch. 139, § 24; 1957, ch. 157, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 37-3; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 47; 1963, ch. 23, § 1; 1965, ch. 115, § 47; 1967, ch. 91, § 1; ch. 181, § 31; 1969, ch. 168, § 33; 1971, ch. 190, § 22; 1973, ch. 162, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20, 21, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision that stated salaries are to be paid, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

For amount of salary, see §

9-3-101

.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in the third sentence of (a), substituted
“seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “two
(2).”

Editor's notes. —

The powers, duties and functions of the board of equalization were transferred to the department of revenue and taxation by ch. 248, Laws 1973. For present provisions as to the powers and purpose of the state board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

The word “present” in subsection (c) first appeared in this section as amended by § 1, ch. 91, Laws 1967, which was made effective from and after passage and approved February 16, 1967.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (f), means Laws 1979, ch. 17, which appears as various sections throughout titles 9 through 11, 13, 21, 23, 24, 26 through 28, 30, 33, 34 through 36 and 37. See the table of disposition of acts in volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Repeal of earlier provisions. —

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 37, § 2, repealed R.S. 1931, § 94-103 (§ 3, ch. 146, Laws 1915) and § 2, ch. 93, Laws 1935, repealed ch. 37, Laws 1933, Sp. Sess. All of these laws provided for the creation of a public service commission.

Section 2, ch. 93, Laws 1935, repealed ch. 37, Laws 1933, Sp. Sess.

Strict construction. —

Statutes creating and empowering the commission must be strictly construed and any reasonable doubt of existence of any power must be resolved against the exercise thereof. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974).

Stated

in

Spence v. Smyth, 686 P.2d 597,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 333

(Wyo. 1984); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

See “The State of Specific Commodity Haulers and the Motor Carrier Act,” 5 Wyo. L.J. 197.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Representation of another before state public utilities or service commission as involving practice of law, 13 ALR3d 812.

§ 37-2-102.
Quorum; meetings; investigations and hearings by single commissioner.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum to transact business and for the performance of any duty or for the exercise of any powers of the commission and may hold meetings of the commission at any time or place within the state. A majority of the commission shall consist of two (2) of the three (3) members, including the chairman, that constitute the commission in the normal course of business. Any investigation, inquiry or hearing which the commission has power to hold may be held by or before any commissioner, or an employee of the commission acting in the capacity of a hearing officer, when an order is entered in the records of the office of the commission to that effect, and such an investigation, inquiry or hearing when approved and confirmed by the commission shall be the investigation, inquiry or hearing of the commission, but no finding or order of the commission shall be effective without the concurrence of a majority of the commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 4; 1917, ch. 74, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 5456; R.S. 1931, § 94-104; C.S. 1945, § 64-104; W.S. 1957, § 37-4; Laws 1963, ch. 23, § 2; 1967, ch. 91, § 2; 1977, ch. 115, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to investigations and hearings, see §§

37-2-201

to

37-2-221

.

§ 37-2-103.
Seal; may sue and be sued.

The commission shall have an official seal bearing the words “Public Service Commission of Wyoming”, of which the courts shall take judicial notice, and may sue and be sued by its official name.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 5457; R.S. 1931, § 94-105; C.S. 1945, § 64-105; W.S. 1957, § 37-5.

Cross references. —

As to actions by or against state agencies, see §§

1-35-101

to

1-35-108

.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” 7 Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 37-2-104.
Gratuities prohibited.

No commissioner or person appointed and regularly employed and receiving a salary from the commission shall accept any gift, gratuity, emolument or employment from any public utility under the jurisdiction of the commission, or any officer, agent or employee thereof, nor shall any commissioner or person appointed or regularly employed by and receiving a salary from the commission solicit, request from, or recommend, directly or indirectly, to any such public utility or any officer or agent or employee thereof, the appointment of any person to any place or position.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 5458; R.S. 1931, § 94-106; C.S. 1945, § 64-106; W.S. 1957, § 37-6.

§ 37-2-105.
Offices, equipment and facilities.

The principal office of the commission shall be at the state capitol, and the commission shall be provided by the state with such offices, equipment and facilities as may be necessary for the performance of its duties.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 5459; R.S. 1931, § 94-107; C.S. 1945, § 64-107; W.S. 1957, § 37-7.

§ 37-2-106.
Assessment regarding telecommunications, gas, electric, water and pipeline service; disposition of revenue.

Monies derived from an assessment of persons subject to assessment under W.S.

37-2-107

, except motor carriers as defined in W.S. 31-18-101(a)(x), shall be credited to the public service commission account for the purpose of defraying administrative expenses of the commission with respect to the persons assessed. At each regular session, the state legislature shall, under the budget provisions of Wyoming budget law, determine the amount to be collected. It shall be the duty of the director of the revenue department to ascertain and collect the proportional amount of the approved biennial budget to be paid by each person assessed and to remit the funds immediately to the state treasurer for deposit in the public service commission account. All expenditures therefrom shall be subject to the warrant of the state auditor, upon submission of properly executed vouchers authorized by the commission in the same manner as other funds are disbursed.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 102, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1997, ch. 110, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2021 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to collection and disposition of fees, see §

37-2-125

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “public service commission account” for “earmarked revenue fund” or similar language.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted the former third sentence pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the section heading, deleted "Uniform" at the beginning and made a related change; and substituted "an" for "a uniform" following "derived from" in the first sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

PacifiCorp v. PSC, 2004 WY 164, 103 P.3d 862,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(2004).

§ 37-2-107.
Assessment regarding telecommunications, gas, electric, water and pipeline service; assessment generally.

On or before the first day of July of each year the director of revenue shall, by requiring special reports or otherwise, determine the total aggregate amount of the gross Wyoming intrastate retail revenues of all public utilities, entities utilizing public utility facilities in the state to furnish retail utility commodities or services to the public, and providers of telecommunication services, except motor carriers, and those utilities exempted under W.S.

37-2-108

, for the preceding calendar year. The director shall then determine the ratio that one-half (1/2) of the total authorized budgeted amount for the biennium is to the total aggregate gross retail Wyoming intrastate operating revenues. The resulting percentage factor shall then be applied to the annual intrastate gross retail operating revenues of each of such persons for the preceding calendar year and the result shall be the assessment of each such person for the ensuing budget fiscal year. However, the assessment rate against the persons for any one (1) year shall not exceed three-thousandths (.003) of the gross Wyoming intrastate retail revenues of the persons unless the assessment of three-thousandths (.003) is insufficient to produce the amount to be collected. If the amount to be collected exceeds the amount produced by the application of the percentage factor to the gross Wyoming intrastate retail revenue of the persons, an additional assessment sufficient to produce the amount to be collected but not to exceed two-thousandths (.002) shall be made against those persons defined as public utilities in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C), (D) or (G) but not cooperative utilities that are eligible for exemption and that choose to opt out from retail rate regulation. By the first day of August the director shall assess the persons, and one-half (1/2) of the assessed fees shall be paid to the director by the persons on or before the first day of October and one-half (1/2) of the fees shall be paid to the director by the persons on or before the first day of April in the ensuing year. The director, in computing the percentage upon which fees for the first fiscal year of the ensuing biennium shall be based, shall deduct any unexpended balance in the commission’s account, less an amount equal to the total of all properly authorized outstanding accounts payable, from one-half (1/2) the total authorized budgeted amount for the biennium, and the resultant figure shall be used instead of the one-half (1/2) of the total authorized budgeted amount for the biennium, as above provided. Any unexpended balance in the commission’s account shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal period. “Intrastate gross retail operating revenues” as used in this section shall mean intrastate gross revenues derived from the provision of telecommunications, gas, electric, water and pipeline service offered for final consumption and not for resale.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 102.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 102, § 2; 1973, ch. 44, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1997, ch. 110, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2012, ch. 84, §§ 101, 102; 2021 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “commission's account” in (a).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” at the beginning of (a); and repealed former (b), which read: “For the year 2002 only, the director of revenue shall assess all persons subject to assessment under subsection (a) of this section as follows: (i) One-half (1/2) of the calendar year 2002 assessment determined on April 1, 2002 shall be paid on or before the first day of June 2002; and (ii) Of the remaining one-half (1/2) of the calendar year 2002 assessment, only two-thirds (2/3) shall be paid on or before the first day of October 2002. This October payment shall serve as a transition to the dates in subsection (a) of this section. The remaining one-third (

1 3

Click to view) shall not be paid.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the section heading, deleted "Uniform" at the beginning and made a related change; in (a), substituted "The director" for "He" in the second sentence, in the fourth sentence, added "unless the assessment of three-thousandths (.003) is insufficient to produce the amount to be collected" and made a stylistic change, added the fifth sentence, in the sixth sentence, deleted "of the revenue department" preceding "shall assess" and substituted "the director" for "him" twice, and deleted "of the revenue department" preceding "in computing" in the seventh sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality, construction, and application of state and local public utility gross receipts tax statutes — modern cases, 58 ALR5th 187.

§ 37-2-108.
Uniform assessment regarding telecommunications, gas, electric, water and pipeline service; exempt persons.

Any person subject to the provisions of this act [§§

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

] shall be exempt from any payments or assessments to be made hereunder for the fiscal budget year following the calendar year in which its gross intrastate retail operating revenues, as defined in W.S.

37-2-107

, total less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 102, § 3; 1997, ch. 110, § 1.

§ 37-2-109.
Uniform assessment regarding telecommunications, gas, electric, water and pipeline service; penalty for violations.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this act [§§

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

], or fails, omits, neglects, or refuses to observe or comply with any requirement, direction or decision of the director of revenue relating thereto, or to file any report as may be required by him, within the time specified, shall be subject to a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each and every offense.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 102, § 4; 1997, ch. 110, § 1.

§ 37-2-110.
Secretary and other employees.

The commission is authorized to employ a secretary and such other persons as may be necessary to enable it to perform the duties imposed upon it by this act and to designate the duties of such employees.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 172, § 2.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 9; 1919, ch. 138, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5461; R.S. 1931, § 94-109; C.S. 1945, § 64-109; W.S. 1957, § 37-9; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2; 2003, ch. 172, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See Tables of Disposition in Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

§ 37-2-111.
Attorney general to be legal adviser; duties; representation by commission attorneys.

The attorney general shall be the legal adviser of the commission and it shall be his duty to represent the commission in all proceedings in any court, before any other agency or before any departments of the federal government. Upon the request of the commission, the attorney general may designate any duly qualified attorney employed by the commission to function as an assistant attorney general to assist the attorney general in representing the commission in all proceedings in any court, before any agency or before any departments of the federal government. Wherever he deems it appropriate, the attorney general may authorize a commission attorney to act without his assistance.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 5462; R.S. 1931, § 94-110; C.S. 1945, § 64-110; W.S. 1957, § 37-10; Laws 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties generally of the attorney general, see §

9-1-603

.

§ 37-2-112.
Powers.

The commission shall have general and exclusive power to regulate and supervise every public utility within the state in accordance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 5463; R.S. 1931, § 94-111; C.S. 1945, § 64-111; W.S. 1957, § 37-11.

Cross references. —

As to rates, interchange of services and safety regulations generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See Tables of Disposition in Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Strict construction. —

Statutes creating and empowering the commission must be strictly construed and any reasonable doubt of existence of any power must be resolved against the exercise thereof. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974); Public Serv. Comm'n v. Formal Complaint of WWZ Co., 641 P.2d 183,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1982).

County does not have power to regulate public utilities.

Vandehei Developers v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 790 P.2d 1282,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1990).

The commission has no inherent or common-law powers,

but has only the power and authority granted by the constitution or statutes creating the same. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974); Public Serv. Comm'n v. Formal Complaint of WWZ Co., 641 P.2d 183,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1982).

The public service commission has no inherent or common-law power, having only the power granted to it by the constitution or statutes, and these must be strictly construed. Phillips Petroleum Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 545 P.2d 1167,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1976).

Commission's role in case of sale of power company's assets

was to ensure that the sale did not result in unjust or unreasonable utility rates for affected consumers, and that determination was not altered by an assertion that the effectuation of the sale was in breach of a contract. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 784 P.2d 627,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 257

(Wyo. 1989).

Commission empowered to reduce incentive award. —

In line with its continuing jurisdiction and the statutory duty to maintain rates which are just and reasonable, the commission necessarily has the “implied or incidental” authority to reduce an incentive award previously granted under §

37-3-115

. The commission's continuing jurisdiction gives it the authority to adjust an incentive award, either up or down, after the original grant, so long as the incentive award remains between zero and 10 percent of the savings and it is just and reasonable. Montana-Dakota Utils. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 746 P.2d 1272,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1987).

Jurisdiction of commission does not extend to publication of yellow pages directory

which is not a service furnished to or for the public. In re Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co., 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

No jurisdiction to adjudicate rights between city and utility. —

Courts, rather than the public service commission, have jurisdiction to adjudicate rights between city and public utility in contract dispute between them. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974).

Commission without authority to enter money judgment. —

The Wyoming statutes do not provide authority for the commission to enter a money judgment in behalf of a certificated freight carrier against its customer for contended under-collection of tariff-scheduled minimum charges. White v. Exeter Drilling Co., 731 P.2d 1193,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1987).

Commission to give public interest paramount consideration. —

The public service commission, in exercising its statutory powers to regulate and supervise public utilities in the state of Wyoming, as provided in this section, is required to give paramount consideration to the public interest, the desires of the utility being secondary. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983).

Limited power to regulate interstate commerce. —

Once established that proposed commerce is exclusively interstate, the Wyoming public service commission cannot regulate it in such a manner as to unduly or substantially burden the free flow thereof. Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Commission cannot order interstate carrier to file tariff based on total billings. —

Since interstate telecommunications service is normally outside the reach of state commissions and within the exclusive jurisdiction of the federal communications commission, the Wyoming public service commission could not lawfully order an interstate carrier to file a tariff based on its total billings, which included interstate calls. AT & T Communications of Mountain States, Inc. v. Public Service Com., 625 F. Supp. 1204, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13499 (D. Wyo. 1985).

Authority over utilities outside corporate limits.—

Legislature
granted a city the authority to provide electricity to customers outside
the city limits via Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-7-201

(2015), but reserved the authority to determine an appropriate rate
for the service provided outside the city limits to the Public Service
Commission (PSC) in Wyo. Stat Ann. §§

37-2-112

, 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C) and (a)(vi)(H)(II) (2015). The language of § 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) unambiguously grants the PSC exclusive regulatory power
over all municipally-owned public utility services provided to customers
outside the municipality's corporate limits. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Quoted

in

In re N. Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1952); K N Energy, Inc. v. City of Casper, 755 P.2d 207,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1988).

Stated

in

Spence v. Smyth, 686 P.2d 597,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 333

(Wyo. 1984); Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 698 P.2d 627,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 472

(Wyo. 1985); Montana Dakota Utils. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 847 P.2d 978,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929); Union Tel. Co. v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 821 P.2d 550,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1991); US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Telephone company's right to change subscriber's telephone number, 75 ALR3d 700.

Incidental provision of utility services, by party not in that business, as subject to regulation by state regulatory authority, 85 ALR4th 894.

Incidental provision of transportation services, by party not primarily in that business, as common carriage subject to state regulatory control, 87 ALR4th 638.

§ 37-2-113.
Arbitration of controversies.

Whenever any Wyoming public utility has a controversy with any other person and all the parties to such controversy agree in writing to submit such controversy to the commission as arbitrators, the commission may act as such arbitrators, and after due notice to all parties interested may proceed to hear such controversy, and their award shall be final.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 12; C.S. 1920, § 5464; R.S. 1931, § 94-112; C.S. 1945, § 64-112; W.S. 1957, § 37-12.

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Uniform Arbitration Act, see §§

1-36-101

to

1-36-119

.

Arbitration long embedded in public policy of state. —

Arbitration as a mode for voluntary final settlement of disputes in an inexpensive and expeditious manner without resort to a tribunal, conducted with rigid formality under strict rules of law, has long been embedded in the public policy of this state. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

It may be applied to statutory, contractual or common-law rights.—

The legislature provided a procedure for arbitration of disputes in utility matters, and it is generally accepted that parties may voluntarily agree to submit to arbitration rights created by statute as well as those arising by contract or common law. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Amendments to certificates of convenience and necessity maybe effected by arbitration. —

The commission, keeping in mind the paramount public interest, may effect amendments to certificates of convenience and necessity upon agreement of the parties involved, and there is nothing inherently wrong in solving the matter by arbitration. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

This section anticipates a proceeding in the nature of a judicial inquiry

in that it requires a submission in writing, notice, and a hearing affording the parties an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Arbitrators' standards of conduct and efficiency differ fromjudicial officers'. —

The standards of judicial conduct and efficiency to which a panel of arbitrators will be held are markedly different from those resting by law and tradition upon judicial officers. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

In an arbitration proceeding the commission will not be held to the same high standards of judicial conduct required in an adversary proceeding since any such approach would frustrate the very purpose of the submission. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Special fitness and knowledge of commission members may supplementevidence. —

The legislature, in providing that members of the commission would preside in arbitrations under this section, no doubt intended that they make use of their special fitness and knowledge in this field in a manner supplementary to such facts as are established by evidence. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Weight and sufficiency of evidence is for commission. —

Under a submission and absent a mistake upon the evidence tantamount to fraud or willful and intentional failure to consider it, the weight and sufficiency of the evidence is for the commission. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Commission without authority to enter money judgment. —

The Wyoming statutes do not provide authority for the commission to enter a money judgment in behalf of a certificated freight carrier against its customer for contended under-collection of tariff-scheduled minimum charges. White v. Exeter Drilling Co., 731 P.2d 1193,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1987).

Words such as “final,” “finality,” “conclusive,” and “binding” are of common usage in the field of arbitration.

In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Words such as “final,” “finality,” “conclusive,” and “binding” are directed to the requirements of the proceeding and the nature of the award to be made.

In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Words are not always controlling as to right of appeal. —

Where the legislature provides that a decision rendered by an inferior tribunal on a matter entrusted to it shall be “final,” “conclusive,” or uses terms of similar import, the provisions will ordinarily be regarded as indicating a denial of the right of appeal, but the use of such expressions is not always controlling. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Term “shall be final” must be considered in light of generalappeal provisions. —

Whatever significance is to be accorded the term “shall be final” on the question of appeal must be directed toward the general provisions for appeal contained in §

37-2-219

.In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

“Shall be final” does not deprive parties of right to challengean award. —

Challenge of an arbitration award under the common law, or under statutes similar to the Uniform Arbitration Act, §§

1-36-101

to

1-36-119

, although limited in extent, has always been available and without more appearing than that the award “shall be final” the supreme court is not disposed to attribute to the legislature an intention to deprive parties of such a valuable right. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Section does not provide right to appeal. —

No right of appeal from an award in voluntary arbitration is contained in this section. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Absent some legal infirmity, award is final and conclusive.—

Absent some legal infirmity, there can be no doubt that an award made under a submission or a statute, or both, unless otherwise provided, is final and conclusive as to the parties. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Judicial review under common law is available. —

Even though the arbitration conducted under this section failed to prescribe a mode of procedure for challenge of the award in the courts, it likewise failed to indicate an intention to abolish or supersede the common-law remedies available for that purpose. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

An arbitration under the law prevailing in this jurisdiction is subject to review under the common-law rule in an appropriate proceeding. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

A trial court has jurisdiction to give equitable relief from an arbitration award

under common law. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Even though it does not have jurisdiction in law under §

37-2-219

. —

See In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Common law provides limited grounds for challenging award.—

An arbitration award in a common-law proceeding was always subject to challenge, although on limited grounds. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

At common law, an award of arbitrators can be set aside, in the absence of an agreement not to appeal, upon four grounds, and only four and they are: (a) corruption; (b) misbehavior amounting to partiality; (c) excess of authority; and (d) such palpable mistake of facts as to satisfy the court that, if it had not been made, the decision of the arbitrators, according to their manifest intent, would have been different. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Sufficiency of allegations in claim for relief from award.—

Where as a part of its claim for relief complainant in substance alleged misbehavior on the part of the arbitrator; alleged that the arbitrator acted without and in excess of its authority; alleged that the arbitrator palpably mistook the facts; and prayed that the award be vacated and set aside, the allegations were sufficient to invoke the general equitable powers of the court and initiate the proceedings. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Burden of proof on review of award. —

It was complainant's burden to show by clear and convincing evidence that the award was obtained by fraud, corruption, behavior beyond the bounds of natural justice, excess of authority, or a manifest mistake of fact or law appearing upon the face of the award. In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

It is not for the supreme court to inquire into the merits of an award.

In re Appeal of Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 391 P.2d 489,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1964).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators — insurance appraisals or arbitrations, 63 ALR5th 675.

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators—torts, 64 ALR5th 475.

§ 37-2-114.
Authority to confer with other state and federal commissions; expenses.

The commission may confer in person, by attending conventions or otherwise, with the members of railroad or other public utility commissions of other states and with the surface transportation board on any matters relating to public utilities, and shall be allowed actual traveling expenses when engaged in such work.

In regulating the transmission of electricity:

The commission may meet in conjunction with public utility commissions of other states as it determines necessary or convenient to develop common sets of fact finding for regulation of the transmission of electricity in the region. Any common set of facts developed under this paragraph shall only be developed under a docketed commission proceeding with opportunity for participation by the public in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and commission rules;

The commission may meet jointly with public utility commissions of other states to conduct hearings on the regulation of the transmission of electricity. The commission shall act independently in entering any order as a result of such hearings;

Subject to W.S.

37-2-122

, the commission may consider regional effects of its orders upon the utility and may consider requirements imposed upon the utility by the laws of other states within the region or the orders of other commissions within the region.

As used in subsection (b) of this section, “region” includes any state with a border contiguous to Wyoming and the states of Arizona, California, Nevada, New Mexico, North Dakota, Oregon and Washington.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 13; C.S. 1920, § 5465; R.S. 1931, § 94-113; C.S. 1945, § 64-113; W.S. 1957, § 37-13; 2010, ch. 78, § 1; 2012, ch. 84, § 103.

The 2010 amendment,

added (b) and (c).

Laws 2010, ch. 78, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “surface transportation board” for “interstate commerce commission” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 78 § 2, provides: “The legislature finds that in the regulation of electric transmission, regional factors should be considered by the public utility regulatory authorities of the various affected states to best promote the interests of the citizens of the region. The development and use of a common set of facts and other cooperation and coordination between the regulatory authorities in the regulation of electric transmission will help establish market certainty and facilitate business decision making, ultimately resulting in more affordable, reliable and environmentally responsible energy.”